Connecticut, session 2026, HB05327.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 10-222c of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
3 (a) No local or regional board of education, governing council of a
4 state or local charter school, interdistrict magnet school operator or
5 supervisory agent of a nonpublic school shall offer employment to an
6 applicant for a position, including any position which is contracted for,
7 if such applicant would have direct student contact, prior to such board,
8 council, operator or supervisory agent:
9 (1) Requiring of such applicant:
10 (A) To list the name, address and telephone number of each current
11 or former employer of the applicant, if such current or former employer
12 was a local or regional board of education, council, operator or
13 supervisory agent or if such employment otherwise caused the
14 applicant to have contact with children;
LCO 1 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5327
15 (B) A written authorization that (i) consents to and authorizes
16 disclosure by the employers listed under subparagraph (A) of this
17 subdivision of the information requested under subdivision (2) of this
18 subsection and the release of related records by such employers, (ii)
19 consents to and authorizes disclosure by the Department of Education
20 of the information requested under subdivision (3) of this subsection
21 and the release of related records by the department, and (iii) releases
22 those employers and the department from liability that may arise from
23 such disclosure or release of records pursuant to subdivision (2) or (3)
24 of this subsection; and
25 (C) A written statement of whether the applicant (i) has been or is the
26 subject of an abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct investigation, or any
27 investigation involving the injury or risk of injury to, or impairing the
28 morals of, a minor by any employer, state agency or municipal police
29 department, unless the investigation resulted in a finding that all
30 allegations were unsubstantiated, (ii) has ever been disciplined or asked
31 to resign from employment or resigned from or otherwise separated
32 from any employment while an allegation of abuse or neglect was
33 pending or under investigation by the Department of Children and
34 Families or such employer, state agency or municipal police
35 department, or an allegation of sexual misconduct was pending or
36 under investigation by such employer, state agency or municipal police
37 department, or an allegation involving the injury or risk of injury to, or
38 impairing the morals of, a minor was pending or under investigation, or
39 due to an allegation substantiated pursuant to section 17a-101g of abuse
40 or neglect, or of sexual misconduct or a conviction for abuse or neglect
41 or sexual misconduct, or (iii) has ever had a professional or occupational
42 license or certificate suspended or revoked or has ever surrendered such
43 a license or certificate while an allegation of abuse or neglect was
44 pending or under investigation by the department or an investigation
45 of sexual misconduct was pending or under investigation, or an
46 allegation involving the injury or risk of injury to, or impairing the
47 morals of, a minor was pending or under investigation, or due to an
48 allegation substantiated by the department of abuse or neglect or of
LCO 2 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5327
49 sexual misconduct or a conviction for abuse or neglect or sexual
50 misconduct;
51 (2) Conducting a review of the employment history of the applicant
52 by contacting those employers listed by the applicant under subdivision
53 (1) of this subsection. Such review shall be conducted using a form
54 developed by the Department of Education in accordance with section
55 3 of public act 16-67 that shall request (A) the dates of employment of
56 the applicant, and (B) a statement as to whether the employer has
57 knowledge that the applicant (i) was or is the subject of an allegation of
58 abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct or involving the injury or risk of
59 injury to, or impairing the morals of, a minor for which there is an
60 investigation pending with any employer, state agency or municipal
61 police department or which has been substantiated, unless such
62 substantiation has been reversed as a result of an appeal conducted
63 pursuant to section 17a-101k; (ii) was disciplined or asked to resign from
64 employment or resigned from or otherwise separated from any
65 employment while an allegation of abuse or neglect or sexual
66 misconduct or involving the injury or risk of injury to, or impairing the
67 morals of, a minor was or is pending or under investigation, or due to a
68 substantiation of abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct or involving the
69 injury or risk of injury to, or impairing the morals of, a minor, unless
70 such substantiation has been reversed as a result of an appeal conducted
71 pursuant to section 17a-101k; or (iii) has ever had a professional or
72 occupational license, certificate, authorization or permit suspended or
73 revoked or has ever surrendered such a license, certificate, authorization
74 or permit while an allegation of abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct
75 or involving the injury or risk of injury to, or impairing the morals of, a
76 minor was pending or under investigation, or due to a substantiation of
77 abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct or involving the injury or risk of
78 injury to, or impairing the morals of, a minor, unless such substantiation
79 has been reversed as a result of an appeal conducted pursuant to section
80 17a-101k. Such review may be conducted telephonically or through
81 written communication. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection
82 (g) of section 31-51i, not later than five business days after any such
LCO 3 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5327
83 current or former employer of the applicant receives a request for such
84 information, such employer shall respond with and is authorized to
85 disclose such information. A local or regional board of education,
86 council, operator or supervisory agent may request more information
87 concerning any response made by a current or former employer, and,
88 notwithstanding the provisions of said subsection (g), such employer
89 shall respond not later than five business days after receiving such
90 request; and
91 (3) Requesting information from the Department of Education
92 concerning (A) the eligibility status for employment of any applicant for
93 a position requiring a certificate, authorization or permit issued
94 pursuant to chapter 166, (B) whether the department has knowledge
95 that an investigation is pending or a finding has been substantiated by
96 the Department of Children and Families pursuant to section 17a-101g
97 of abuse or neglect or of sexual misconduct or involving the injury or
98 risk of injury to, or impairing the morals of, a minor against the
99 applicant and any information concerning such [a] investigation or
100 finding, and (C) whether the department has received notification that
101 the applicant has been convicted of a crime or of criminal charges
102 pending against the applicant and any information concerning such
103 charges.
104 (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (g) of section 31-51i,
105 any local or regional board of education, council, operator or
106 supervisory agent that receives information that an applicant for a
107 position with or an employee of the board is under investigation or has
108 been disciplined for a finding of abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct
109 or involving the injury or risk of injury to, or impairing the morals of, a
110 minor shall notify the Department of Education of such information.
111 (c) No local or regional board of education, council, operator or
112 supervisory agent shall employ an applicant for a position involving
113 direct student contact who does not comply with the provisions of
114 subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section.
LCO 4 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5327
115 (d) A local or regional board of education, council, operator or
116 supervisory agent may employ or contract with an applicant on a
117 temporary basis for a period not to exceed ninety days, pending the
118 review of information received under this section by such board,
119 council, operator or supervisory agent, provided:
120 (1) The applicant complied with subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of
121 this section;
122 (2) The board, council, operator or supervisory agent has no
123 knowledge of information pertaining to the applicant that would
124 disqualify the applicant from employment with the board, council,
125 operator or supervisory agent; and
126 (3) The applicant affirms that the applicant is not disqualified from
127 employment with such board, council, operator or supervisory agent.
128 (e) No local or regional board of education, council, operator or
129 supervisory agent shall enter into a collective bargaining agreement, an
130 employment contract, an agreement for resignation or termination, a
131 severance agreement or any other contract or agreement or take any
132 action that:
133 (1) Has the effect of suppressing or requiring the nondisclosure of
134 information relating to [an] a pending investigation of a report of
135 suspected abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct or involving the injury
136 or risk of injury to, or impairing the morals of, a minor by a current or
137 former employee;
138 (2) Affects the ability of the local or regional board of education,
139 council, operator or supervisory agent to report suspected abuse or
140 neglect or sexual misconduct to appropriate authorities; or
141 (3) Requires the local or regional board of education, council,
142 operator or supervisory agent to expunge information about an
143 allegation or a finding of suspected abuse or neglect or sexual
144 misconduct or involving the injury or risk of injury to, or impairing the
LCO 5 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5327
145 morals of, a minor from any documents maintained by the board, unless
146 after investigation such allegation is [dismissed or] found to be false.
147 (f) No local or regional board of education, council, operator or
148 supervisory agent shall offer employment to a person as a substitute
149 teacher, unless such person and such board, council, operator or
150 supervisory agent comply with the provisions of subsection (a) of this
151 section. The board, council, operator or supervisory agent shall
152 determine which such persons are employable as substitute teachers
153 and maintain a list of such persons. No board, council, operator or
154 supervisory agent shall hire any person as a substitute teacher who is
155 not on such list. Such person shall remain on such list as long as such
156 person is continuously employed by the board, council, operator or
157 supervisory agent as a substitute teacher, as described in subsection (c)
158 of section 10-221d, provided the board, council, operator or supervisory
159 agent does not have any knowledge of a reason that such person should
160 be removed from such list.
161 (g) In the case of an applicant who is a contractor, the contractor shall
162 require any employee with such contractor who would be in a position
163 involving direct student contact to supply to such contractor all
164 information required of an applicant under subparagraphs (A) and (C)
165 of subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section and a written
166 authorization under subparagraph (B) of said subdivision. Such
167 contractor shall contact any current or former employer of such
168 employee that was a local or regional board of education, council,
169 operator or supervisory agent or if such employment caused the
170 employee to have contact with children, and request, either
171 telephonically or through written communication, any information
172 concerning whether there is a pending or open investigation or was a
173 finding of abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct or involving the injury
174 or risk of injury to, or impairing the morals of, a minor against such
175 employee. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (g) of section
176 31-51i, such employer shall report to the contractor any such
177 investigation or finding, either telephonically or through written
178 communication. If the contractor receives any information indicating
LCO 6 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5327
179 such [a] investigation or finding or otherwise has knowledge of such [a]
180 investigation or finding, the contractor shall, notwithstanding the
181 provisions of said subsection (g), immediately forward such
182 information to any local or regional board of education, council,
183 operator or supervisory agent with which the contractor is under
184 contract, either telephonically or through written communication. Any
185 local or regional board of education, council, operator or supervisory
186 agent that receives such information shall determine whether such
187 employee may work in a position involving direct student contact at any
188 school under the jurisdiction or control of such board, council, operator
189 or supervisory agent. No determination by a local or regional board of
190 education, council, operator or supervisory agent that any such
191 employee shall not work under any such contract in any such position
192 shall constitute a breach of such contract.
193 (h) Any applicant who knowingly provides false information or
194 knowingly fails to disclose information required in subdivision (1) of
195 subsection (a) of this section shall be subject to discipline by the
196 employing local or regional board of education, council, operator or
197 supervisory agent that may include (1) denial of employment, or (2)
198 termination of the contract of a certified employee, in accordance with
199 the provisions of section 10-151.
200 (i) Any employer who provides information in accordance with
201 subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section or subsection (g) of this
202 section and the Department of Education for the provision of
203 information requested in accordance with subdivision (3) of said
204 subsection (a) shall be immune from criminal and civil liability,
205 provided the employer or department did not knowingly supply false
206 information.
207 (j) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-151c and subsection
208 (g) of section 31-51i, a local or regional board of education, council,
209 operator or supervisory agent shall provide upon request by any other
210 local or regional board of education, council, operator or supervisory
211 agent for the purposes of an inquiry pursuant to subdivision (2) of
LCO 7 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5327
212 subsection (a) of this section or subsection (g) of this section or to the
213 Commissioner of Education pursuant to subsection (b) of this section
214 any information that the board, council, operator or supervisory agent
215 has concerning [a] an investigation or finding of abuse or neglect or
216 sexual misconduct or involving the injury or risk of injury to, or
217 impairing the morals of, a minor by a subject of any such inquiry.
218 (k) For purposes of this section and section 10-221d, as amended by
219 this act, (1) "sexual misconduct" means any verbal, nonverbal, written
220 or electronic communication, or any other act directed toward or with a
221 student that is designed to establish a sexual relationship with the
222 student, including a sexual invitation, dating or soliciting a date,
223 engaging in sexual dialog, making sexually suggestive comments, self-
224 disclosure or physical exposure of a sexual or erotic nature and any
225 other sexual, indecent or erotic contact with a student; (2) "abuse or
226 neglect" means abuse or neglect as described in section 46b-120, and
227 includes any violation of section 53a-70, 53a-70a, 53a-71, 53a-72a, 53a-
228 72b or 53a-73a; and (3) "former employer" means any local or regional
229 board of education, governing council of a state or local charter school
230 or interdistrict magnet school operator, person, firm, business,
231 educational institution, nonprofit agency, corporation, limited liability
232 company, the state, any political subdivision of the state, any
233 governmental agency, or any other entity that such applicant was
234 employed by during any of the previous twenty years prior to applying
235 for a position with a local or regional board of education, governing
236 council of a state or local charter school or interdistrict magnet school
237 operator.
238 (l) Prior to offering employment to an applicant, a local or regional
239 board of education, council, operator or supervisory agent shall make a
240 documented good faith effort to contact each current and any former
241 employer that was a local or regional board of education, council,
242 operator or supervisory agent or if such employment otherwise caused
243 the applicant to have contact with children of the applicant in order to
244 obtain information and recommendations which may be relevant to the
245 applicant's fitness for employment, including whether there is a
LCO 8 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5327
246 pending investigation of the applicant for allegations of abuse or neglect
247 or sexual misconduct or involving the injury or risk of injury to, or
248 impairing the morals of, a minor conducted by such former employer,
249 provided such effort shall not be construed to require more than three
250 telephonic requests made on three separate days.
251 (m) No local or regional board of education, council, operator or
252 supervisory agent shall offer employment to any applicant who had any
253 previous employment contract terminated by a board, council, operator
254 or supervisory agent or who resigned from such employment, if such
255 [person] applicant (1) has been convicted of a violation of section 17a-
256 101o, [when] (2) has had an allegation of abuse or neglect or sexual
257 [assault has been] misconduct substantiated, or (3) is being investigated
258 or has a pending investigation for abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct
259 or involving the injury or risk of injury to, or impairing the morals of, a
260 minor.
261 Sec. 2. Subsection (f) of section 10-221d of the general statutes is
262 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
263 2026):
264 (f) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (g) of section 31-51i,
265 and to the extent permissible under state and federal laws regarding the
266 dissemination of criminal history records, the State Board of Education
267 shall, upon request of an eligible school operator, make available to such
268 eligible school operator requesting information concerning an applicant
269 for a position with such eligible school operator (1) any information
270 concerning the applicant's eligibility for employment in a position with
271 such eligible school operator requiring a certificate, authorization or
272 permit issued pursuant to chapter 166, (2) whether the department has
273 knowledge that the applicant has been disciplined for a finding of abuse
274 or neglect or sexual misconduct, as defined in section 10-222c, as
275 amended by this act, or involving the injury or risk of injury to, or
276 impairing the morals of, a minor, and any information concerning such
277 a finding, [and] (3) whether the department has received notification
278 that the applicant has been convicted of a crime or of criminal charges
LCO 9 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5327
279 pending against the applicant and any information concerning such
280 charges, and (4) whether the department has been notified pursuant to
281 subsection (b) of section 10-222c, as amended by this act, that the
282 applicant is under investigation or has been disciplined for a finding of
283 abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct or involving the injury or risk of
284 injury to, or impairing the morals of, a minor by a former employer, as
285 defined in section 10-222c, as amended by this act, unless the
286 investigation resulted in a finding that all allegations were false or
287 unsubstantiated. The provisions of this subsection shall not be
288 construed to cause the state board to investigate any such request or
289 disseminate the results of any national criminal history records check.
290 Sec. 3. Subsection (f) of section 10-232a of the 2026 supplement to the
291 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
292 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
293 (f) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (g) of section 31-51i,
294 and to the extent permissible under state and federal laws regarding the
295 dissemination of criminal history records, the State Board of Education
296 shall, upon request of a nongovernmental school operator, make
297 available to such nongovernmental school operator requesting
298 information concerning an applicant for a position with such
299 nongovernmental school operator, (1) any information concerning the
300 applicant's eligibility for employment in a position with such
301 nongovernmental school operator requiring a certificate, authorization
302 or permit issued pursuant to chapter 166, (2) whether the department
303 has knowledge that the applicant has been disciplined for a finding of
304 abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct, as defined in section 10-222c, as
305 amended by this act, or involving the injury or risk of injury to, or
306 impairing the morals of, a minor and any information concerning such
307 a finding, [and] (3) whether the department has received notification
308 that the applicant has been convicted of a crime or of criminal charges
309 pending against the applicant and any information concerning such
310 charges, and (4) whether the department has been notified pursuant to
311 subsection (b) of section 10-222c, as amended by this act, that the
312 applicant is under investigation or has been disciplined for a finding of
LCO 10 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 5327
313 abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct or involving the injury or risk of
314 injury to, or impairing the morals of, a minor by a former employer, as
315 defined in section 10-222c, as amended by this act, unless the
316 investigation resulted in a finding that all allegations were false or
317 unsubstantiated. The provisions of this subsection shall not be
318 construed to cause the state board to investigate any such request or
319 disseminate the results of any national criminal history records check.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 10-222c
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 10-221d(f)
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 10-232a(f)
ED Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 11 of 11